Maryland, session 2026, HB1454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1454*

HOUSE BILL 1454
Article – Election Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless a
different meaning is clearly intended from the context.
(aa) (1) “Expenditure” means a gift, transfer, disbursement, or promise of
money or a thing of value by or on behalf of a campaign finance entity to:
[(1)] (I) promote or assist in the promotion of the success or defeat of a
candidate, political party, question, or prospective question at an election;
[(2)] (II) pay expenses associated with contesting an election under Title
12 of this article; or
[(3)] (III) pay for the publication expense of a legislative newsletter under
Title 13, Subtitle 4 of this article.
(2) “EXPENDITURE” INCLUDES A SECURITY EXPENDITURE UNDER §
13–251 OF THIS ARTICLE.
13–221.
(a) (1) The treasurer of a campaign finance entity shall keep a detailed and
accurate account book of all assets received, expenditures made, and obligations incurred
by or on behalf of the entity.
(2) Except as provided in § 13–240 of this subtitle, as to each asset received
or expenditure made, the account book shall state:
(i) its amount or value;
(ii) the date of the receipt or expenditure;
(iii) the name and address of the person from whom the asset was
received or to whom the expenditure was made; [and]
(iv) a description of the asset received or the purpose for which the
expenditure was made; AND
(V) FOR A SECURITY EXPENDITURE OR REIMBURSEMENT
UNDER § 13–251 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A DESCRIPTION OF THE EVIDENCE OF THE
THREAT THAT GAVE RISE TO THE SECURITY EXPENDITURE.

HOUSE BILL 1454 3
13–251.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONTINUING THREAT” MEANS A THREAT TO A PROTECTEE THAT:
(I) ARISES FROM THE PROTECTEE’S ACTIVITIES, DUTIES, OR
STATUS AS, OR ASSOCIATION WITH, A CANDIDATE OR ELECTED OFFICIAL; AND
(II) HAS BEEN REPORTED TO, AND VERIFIED BY, AN
APPROPRIATE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
(3) “PAY” INCLUDES REIMBURSEMENT TO THE STATE FOR A
SECURITY EXPENSE ASSOCIATED WITH A PROTECTEE.
(4) (I) “PROTECTEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS BEING
PROTECTED.
(II) “PROTECTEE” INCLUDES:
1. A CANDIDATE;
2. AN ELECTED OFFICIAL;
3. A MEMBER OF THE IMMEDIATE FAMILY OF A
CANDIDATE OR ELECTED OFFICIAL; AND
4. A MEMBER OF THE STAFF OF A CANDIDATE OR
ELECTED OFFICIAL.
(5) “SECURITY EXPENDITURE” INCLUDES PAYMENT FOR THE
REASONABLE COST OF:
(I) THE INSTALLATION AND MONITORING OF AN ELECTRONIC
SECURITY SYSTEM;
(II) PERSONAL SECURITY SERVICES;
(III) REIMBURSING THE STATE FOR GOODS OR SERVICES
NECESSARY TO PROVIDE SECURITY TO A PROTECTEE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1454
(IV) OTHER GOODS OR SERVICES NECESSARY TO PROVIDE
SECURITY TO A PROTECTEE.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A SECURITY
EXPENDITURE MAY BE MADE FROM CAMPAIGN FUNDS IF A THREAT TO A
PROTECTEE’S SAFETY ARISES FROM:
(1) THE PROTECTEE’S ACTIVITIES, DUTIES, OR STATUS AS A
CANDIDATE OR ELECTED OFFICIAL; OR
(2) THE PROTECTEE’S ASSOCIATION WITH A CANDIDATE OR ELECTED
OFFICIAL.
(C) A SECURITY EXPENDITURE MAY NOT BE MADE:
(1) TO PAY FOR A FIREARM; OR
(2) TO A CANDIDATE OR ELECTED OFFICIAL’S CHILD, GRANDCHILD,
GREAT–GRANDCHILD, PARENT, GRANDPARENT, GREAT–GRANDPARENT, SIBLING,
SIBLING’S CHILD, OR PARENT’S SIBLING.
(D) TOTAL LIFETIME SECURITY EXPENDITURES MADE ON BEHALF OF AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A CANDIDATE OR AN ELECTED OFFICIAL MAY NOT EXCEED
$10,000.
(E) WITHIN THE TIME PERIOD REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS
SECTION:
(1) A TANGIBLE ITEM PURCHASED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
RETURNED TO THE CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY THAT PURCHASED THE TANGIBLE
ITEM; OR
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION, THE
INDIVIDUAL WHO RETAINS THE TANGIBLE ITEM SHALL REIMBURSE THE CAMPAIGN
FINANCE ENTITY THAT PURCHASED THE TANGIBLE ITEM.
(F) REIMBURSEMENT OR RETURN OF A TANGIBLE ITEM UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE MADE:
(1) FOR A CONTINUING THREAT, AT THE EARLIER OF:
(I) WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE CESSATION OF THE CONTINUING
THREAT; OR

HOUSE BILL 1454 5
(II) ON SALE OF THE REAL PROPERTY FOR WHICH A TANGIBLE
ITEM WAS PURCHASED WITH A SECURITY EXPENDITURE; OR
(2) FOR A THREAT OTHER THAN A CONTINUING THREAT, AT THE
EARLIER OF:
(I) WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE END OF AN ELECTED OFFICIAL’S
TERM OR AFTER A CANDIDATE CEASES TO BE A CANDIDATE; OR
(II) ON SALE OF THE REAL PROPERTY FOR WHICH A TANGIBLE
ITEM WAS PURCHASED THROUGH A SECURITY EXPENDITURE.
(G) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL REIMBURSE A CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY
FOR A TANGIBLE ITEM RETAINED UNDER THIS SECTION AT FAIR MARKET VALUE.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
FAIR MARKET VALUE SHALL BE DETERMINED AT THE EARLIER OF THE TIME THAT
THE REIMBURSEMENT IS MADE OR THE TIME THAT THE REIMBURSEMENT IS DUE.
(H) FOR A TANGIBLE ITEM PURCHASED FOR, OR A SECURITY SYSTEM
INSTALLED AT THE HOME OR OFFICE OR ON THE VEHICLE OF, AN IMMEDIATE
FAMILY MEMBER OR STAFF OF A CANDIDATE OR ELECTED OFFICIAL,
REIMBURSEMENT MAY BE MADE BY THE CANDIDATE OR ELECTED OFFICIAL OR THE
IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER OR STAFF OF THE CANDIDATE OR ELECTED OFFICIAL.
(I) (1) IN EACH CAMPAIGN FINANCE REPORT THAT INCLUDES A
SECURITY EXPENDITURE, A CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE THREAT THAT NECESSITATED THE
SECURITY EXPENDITURE; AND
(II) DOCUMENTATION SUFFICIENT TO VERIFY THE THREAT.
(2) INFORMATION REQUIRED TO BE REPORTED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE ON A FORM THAT THE STATE BOARD REQUIRES.
13–304.
(b) A campaign finance report filed by a campaign finance entity under subsection
(a) of this section shall include:

HOUSE BILL 1454
(1) the information required by the State Board with respect to all
contributions received and all expenditures made by or on behalf of the campaign finance
entity during the designated reporting period; [and]
(2) the information regarding the occupations and employers of
contributors required to be recorded by the treasurer of a campaign finance entity under §
13–221 of this title; AND
(3) THE INFORMATION REGARDING SECURITY EXPENDITURES
REQUIRED TO BE REPORTED UNDER § 13–251 OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.